Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,336
Snowmobile contests; requirements; violation; penalty.

Nothing in sections 60-6,320 to 60-6,346 shall prohibit the use of snowmobiles within the right-of-way of any highway in any international or other sponsored contest, except that prior written permission for such contests shall first be obtained by the sponsoring persons or group from the official or board having jurisdiction over the highway upon which the contest is to be held. Any person holding a snowmobile contest on any right-of-way of a highway without first obtaining written permission therefor shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished as provided by section 60-6,343. In permitting such contest, the official or board having jurisdiction may prescribe such restrictions or conditions as may be deemed advisable.

Laws 1971, LB 330, § 14;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2014;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 432.